Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.30, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Testing process. (a) The commissioner must determine the testing process and the order of administration. (b) The commissioner must establish a testing period as late as possible each school year during which schools must administer the Minnesota Comprehensive Assessments to studentsnew text begin in grades 3 through 8 and a nationally recognized college entrance exam to high school students, typically in grade 11 or 12new text end . The commissioner must publish the testing schedule at least two years before the beginning of the testing period. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.30, subdivision 12, is amended to read: Subd. 12. Test administration. (a) The Department of Education deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end contract for professional and technical services according to competitive solicitation procedures under chapter 16C for purposes of this section.new text begin The department must contract with a provider of a nationally recognized college entrance exam to fulfill any obligations of this section or to satisfy federal accountability requirements for testing in the 2026-2027 school year and later.new text end (b) A proposal submitted under this section must include disclosures containing: (1) comprehensive information regarding test administration monitoring practices; and (2) data privacy safeguards for student information to be transmitted to or used by the proposing entity. (c) Information provided in the proposal is not security information or trade secret information for purposes of section 13.37. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin The commissioner must contract with the provider to begin testing in the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.30, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Parental review. Consistent with section 13.34, the commissioner must adopt and publish a policy to provide public and parental access for review of Minnesota-developed assessments which would not compromise the objectivity or fairness of the testing or examination process. Upon receiving a written request, the commissioner must make available to parents or guardians a copy of their student's actual responses to the test questions for their review.new text begin The commissioner must make a webpage available to students and parents or guardians that provides information on the content, structure, and uses of the nationally recognized college entrance exam, and also includes resources for exam preparation.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.30, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. College entrance exam. deleted text begin Though not a high school graduation requirement, students are encouraged to participate indeleted text end new text begin The commissioner must adoptnew text end a nationally recognized college entrance examnew text begin and provide it, at no cost, to each student in grade 11 or, if deferred, grade 12 in accordance with section 120B.302, subdivision 1. The commissioner must use the nationally recognized college entrance exam to satisfy federal educational accountability requirements in English language arts, math, and sciencenew text end . deleted text begin To the extent state funding for college entrance exam fees is available, a district must pay the cost, one time, for an interested student in grade 11 or 12 who is eligible for a free or reduced-price meal, to take a nationally recognized college entrance exam before graduating. A student must be able to take the exam under this paragraph at the student's high school during the school day and at any one of the multiple exam administrations available to students in the district.deleted text end A district may administer deleted text begin the ACT or SAT or both the ACT and SAT to comply with this paragraphdeleted text end new text begin a nationally recognized college entrance exam to satisfy federal accountability requirements in English language arts, math, and sciencenew text end . deleted text begin If the district administers only one of these two tests and a free or reduced-price meal eligible student opts not to take that test and chooses instead to take the other of the two tests, the student may take the other test at a different time or location and remains eligible for the examination fee reimbursement. Notwithstanding sections 123B.34 to 123B.39, a school district may require a student that is not eligible for a free or reduced-price meal to pay the cost of taking a nationally recognized college entrance exam. The district must waive the cost for a student unable to pay.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.302, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Developing assessments. For purposes of conforming with existing federal educational accountability requirements, the commissioner must develop and implement computer-adaptive reading and mathematics assessments for grades 3 through 8, state-developed high school reading and mathematics tests aligned with state academic standardsdeleted text begin , a high school writing test aligned with state standards when it becomes available,deleted text end and science assessments that districts and sites must use to monitor student growth toward achieving those standards. new text begin The commissioner must also provide a nationally recognized college entrance exam to students in grade 11 or, if deferred, grade 12. new text end The commissioner must: (1) not develop statewide assessments for academic standards in social studies, health and physical education, and the arts; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (2) require annual science assessments in one grade in the grades 3 through 5 spandeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (3) require annual science assessments in one grade innew text end the grades 6 through 8 spandeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and deleted text begin a life sciences assessment in the grades 9 through 12 span, anddeleted text end new text begin (4) provide students in grade 11 or, if deferred, grade 12, with the opportunity to take a nationally recognized college entrance exam that provides a science test and a STEM score.new text end The commissioner must not require students to achieve a passing score on high school science assessments as a condition of receiving a high school diploma. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.303, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Targeted instruction plan. A student under subdivision 1, clause (1), must receive targeted, relevant, academically rigorous, and resourced instruction, which may include a targeted instruction and intervention plan focused on improving the student's knowledge and skills in core subjects so that the student has a reasonable chance to succeed in a career or college without need for postsecondary remediation. Consistent with sections 120B.13, 124D.09, 124D.091, 124D.49, and related sections, an enrolling school or district must new text begin provide a grade 11, or if deferred, grade 12 student with the opportunity to take a nationally recognized college entrance exam and new text end actively encourage deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin thenew text end student deleted text begin in grade 11 or 12 who is identified as academically ready for a career or collegedeleted text end to participate in courses and programs awarding college credit to high school students. Students are not required to achieve a specified score or level of proficiency on an assessment under this subdivision to graduate from high school. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.305, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Reporting requirements. (a) Reporting of state assessment results must: (1) provide timely, useful, and understandable information on the performance of individual students, schools, school districts, and the state; (2) include a growth indicator of student achievement; and (3) determine whether students have met the state's academic standards. (b) The commissioner must ensure that for annual computer-adaptive assessments: (1) individual student performance data and achievement reports are available within three school days of when students take an assessment except in a year when an assessment reflects new performance standards; (2) growth information is available for each student from the student's first assessment to each proximate assessment using a constant measurement scale; (3) parents, teachers, and school administrators are able to use elementary and middle school student performance data to project students' secondary and postsecondary achievement; and (4) useful diagnostic information about areas of students' academic strengths and weaknesses is available to teachers and school administrators for improving student instruction and indicating the specific skills and concepts that should be introduced and developed for students at given performance levels, organized by strands within subject areas, and aligned to state academic standards. (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the chancellor of the Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, must establish empirically derived benchmarks on the high school tests that reveal a trajectory toward career and college readiness consistent with section 136F.302, subdivision 1a. new text begin The commissioner may use data obtained from the nationally recognized college entrance exam provided to grade 11, or if deferred, grade 12 students and the vertically aligned assessment provided to students between grades 8 and 10 to establish the criteria and report on student trajectories toward career and college readiness. new text end The commissioner must disseminate to the public the computer-adaptive assessments and high school test results upon receiving those results. (d) A school, school district, or charter school may provide a student's parent access to the student's individual student performance data and achievement report that is made available under paragraph (b), clause (1), when the performance data and report is available to the school, school district, or charter school. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136F.302, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. ACT or SAT college ready score; Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment career and college ready benchmarks. (a) A state college or university must not require an individual to take a remedial, noncredit course in a subject area if the individual has received a college ready ACT or SAT score deleted text begin or met a career and college ready Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment benchmark in that subject areadeleted text end . Only the ACT and SAT scores an individual received deleted text begin and the Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment benchmarks an individual metdeleted text end in the previous five years are valid for purposes of this section. Each state college and university must post notice of the exemption from remedial course taking on its website explaining student course placement requirements. (b) When deciding if an individual is admitted to or if an individual may enroll in a state college or university, the state college or university must consider the individual's scores on the deleted text begin high school Minnesota Comprehensive Assessmentsdeleted text end new text begin ACT or SATnew text end , in addition to other factors determined relevant by the college or university. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 136F.302, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. deleted text begin Minnesota comprehensive assessmentdeleted text end new text begin ACT or SATnew text end career and college ready deleted text begin benchmarksdeleted text end new text begin scoresnew text end ; remedial education. (a) A state college or university must not require an individual to take a remedial, noncredit course in a subject area if the individual has received a career and college ready deleted text begin Minnesota Comprehensive Assessment benchmarkdeleted text end new text begin ACT or SAT scorenew text end in that subject area, consistent with benchmarks established by the commissioner of education pursuant to section 120B.305, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). (b) As part of the notification of high school students and their families under section 120B.305, subdivision 2, paragraph (b), the commissioner shall include a statement that students who receive a college ready deleted text begin benchmarkdeleted text end new text begin scorenew text end on the high school deleted text begin MCAdeleted text end new text begin ACT or SATnew text end are not required to take a remedial, noncredit course at a Minnesota state college or university in the corresponding subject area. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 120B.302, subdivision 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04132 120B.302 GENERAL REQUIREMENTS; TEST DESIGN. Subd. 2. Comprehensive assessment system. The commissioner, with advice from experts with appropriate technical qualifications and experience and stakeholders, must include state-developed tests in the comprehensive assessment system. State-developed tests administered to all students in a subject other than writing must include multiple choice questions.